Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF BEARDSLEY WATER QUALITY PROJECT; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the clean water fund to the Board of Water and Soil Resources for a grant to the city of Beardsley to remove and replace or to repair a portion of drain line in the gravity pipe system designed to remove excess water from Dry Lake to improve and protect water quality and prevent flooding. The city must undertake this project in coordination with the Upper Minnesota River Watershed District. new text end